District of Columbia statutes.
19-1301.10

Others treated as qualified beneficiaries.

(a)

Whenever notice to qualified beneficiaries of a trust is required under this chapter, the trustee must also give notice to any other beneficiary who has sent the trustee a request for notice.

(b)

A charitable organization expressly designated to receive distributions under the terms of a charitable trust or a person appointed to enforce a trust created for the care of an animal or another noncharitable purpose as provided in section 19-1304.08 or section 19-1304.09 has the rights of a qualified beneficiary under this chapter.

(c)

The Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia has the rights of a qualified beneficiary with respect to a charitable trust having its principal place of administration in the District of Columbia.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 110 of the Uniform Trust Code.